Wyoming, session 2026, SF0078.
Be It Enacted by the Legislature of the State of Wyoming:

Section 1. W.S. 39-11-101(a)(xvii) by creating a new
subparagraph (C), by renumbering (C) as (D) and by creating
a new paragraph (xix) and 39-13-103(b)(iii)(intro), by
creating a new subparagraph (C) and by renumbering (C) as
(D) are amended to read:

39-11-101. Definitions.

SF0078

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0103
(a) As used in this act unless otherwise specifically
provided:

(xvii) "Taxable value" means a percent of the
fair market value of property in a particular class as
follows:

(C) Residential real property, eight and
three-tenths percent (8.3%);

(C)(D) All other property, real and
personal, including property valued and assessed under W.S.
39-13-102(m)(vi) and (ix), nine and one-half percent
(9.5%).

(xix) "Residential real property" means real
property improved by a dwelling designed to house not more
than three (3) families and includes associated residential
land where the dwelling is located if the land is owned by
the owner of the dwelling. The dwelling may be any type of
residence including a single family home or an individual
condominium unit if the dwelling is used as a primary
residence.
SF0078

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0103

39-13-103. Imposition.

(b) Basis of tax. The following shall apply:

(iii) Beginning January 1, 1989, "Taxable value"
means a percent of the fair market value of property in a
particular class as follows:

(C) Residential real property, eight and
three-tenths percent (8.3%);

(C)(D) All other property, real and
personal, nine and one-half percent (9.5%).

Section 2. This act shall first apply to the tax year
beginning January 1, 2026.

SF0078

2026 STATE OF WYOMING 26LSO-0103
Section 3. This act is effective immediately upon
completion of all acts necessary for a bill to become law
as provided by Article 4, Section 8 of the Wyoming
Constitution.

(END)
SF0078